lexd_components/hyw-added_kogian.lexd
# Words from Kogian dictionary
#  Fr. S. L. Kogian, Armenian-English Vocabulary. Vienna: Mechitarist Press (1949)
# http://www.nayiri.com/imagedDictionaryBrowser.jsp?dictionaryId=111&dt=HY_EN

LEXICON AdjReg
պարսկերէն:պարսկերէն
գեղջուկ:գեղջուկ
հեղուկ:հեղուկ
ցից:ցից
հոմանուն:հոմանուն
ընդեղէն:ընդեղէն
կեղտերէն:կեղտերէն
կոչական:կոչական
հայկաբան:հայկաբան
հայցական:հայցական
ճամարտակ:ճամարտակ
մասնակից:մասնակից
մեռեալ:մեռեալ
մեռել:մեռել
յուշարար:յուշարար
ննջեցեալ:ննջեցեալ
իրաներէն:իրաներէն
շրջանաւարտ:շրջանաւարտ
ուխտադրուժ:ուխտադրուժ
ուխտազանց:ուխտազանց
կռուարար:կռուարար
հայաստանցի:հայաստանցի
անգլիերէն:անգլիերէն
գերմաներէն:գերմաներէն
հիտտիտերէն:հիտտիտերէն
տոխարերէն:տոխարերէն
առապար:առապար
գոհար:գոհար
հրեայ:հրեայ
շոշորթ:շոշորթ
ուղղական:ուղղական
ունայնաբան:ունայնաբան
պատառաբոյծ:պատառաբոյծ
պնակալէզ:պնակալէզ
պոռնիկ:պոռնիկ
պորտաբոյծ:պորտաբոյծ
սեռական:սեռական
սկսնակ:սկսնակ
սուտակասպաս:սուտակասպաս
աղէկ:աղէկ
յառաջ:յառաջ
ազգակից:ազգակից
ազգասէր:ազգասէր
ակնյայտնի:ակնյայտնի
աղուոր:աղուոր
աղցան:աղցան
բազում:բազում
ամուլ:ամուլ
ամուրի:ամուրի
անդրադարձ:անդրադարձ
անթել:անթել
անիշխանական:անիշխանական
անուղղակի:անուղղակի
անքթիթ:անքթիթ
ապօրինի:ապօրինի
արական:արական
արքայանիստ:արքայանիստ
բարերար:բարերար
բացբերան:բացբերան
բնածին:բնածին
բորոտ:բորոտ
բուն:բուն
գերիվեր:գերիվեր
դիեցիկ:դիեցիկ
դիմահար:դիմահար
դիւթիչ:դիւթիչ
դրսեցի:դրսեցի
եսասէր:եսասէր
երաշխաւոր:երաշխաւոր
զեղծարար:զեղծարար
զիլ:զիլ
ընկերվարական:ընկերվարական
թերի:թերի
թզուկ:թզուկ
թթու:թթու
ժրաջան:ժրաջան
լուսնկայ:լուսնկայ
խակ:խակ
խաղք:խաղք
խատուտիկ:խատուտիկ
խեղկատակ:խեղկատակ
խիկար:խիկար
ծծուն:ծծուն
կաթողիկէ:կաթողիկէ
կարգազուրկ:կարգազուրկ
կորնթարդ:կորնթարդ
կուսակրօն:կուսակրօն
հազարեակ:հազարեակ
հակադիր:հակադիր
հակոտնեայ:հակոտնեայ
համով:համով
հանածոյ:հանածոյ
հաւան:հաւան
հետամուտ:հետամուտ
հիւանդ:հիւանդ
հիւսկէն:հիւսկէն
հմուտ:հմուտ
հնոտի:հնոտի
ձեռագործ:ձեռագործ
մակաբոյծ:մակաբոյծ
մատակ:մատակ
մեծաքանակ:մեծաքանակ
միջակ:միջակ
մունջ:մունջ
յարակատար:յարակատար
յետին:յետին
յոյն:յոյն
նայ:նայ
ներգոյական:ներգոյական
ներհուն:ներհուն
նժդեհ:նժդեհ
նիզակակից:նիզակակից
նիւթապաշտ:նիւթապաշտ
նորեկ:նորեկ
շամբուշ:շամբուշ
շնորդի:շնորդի
շուշտակ:շուշտակ
ոստանիկ:ոստանիկ
որձ:որձ
ուսումնական:ուսումնական
չունեւոր:չունեւոր
չտես:չտես
պաղարիւն:պաղարիւն
պայթուցիկ:պայթուցիկ
պատասխանատու:պատասխանատու
պատեհ:պատեհ
պատուելի:պատուելի
պարբերական:պարբերական
պարտուպատշաճ:պարտուպատշաճ
պղերգ:պղերգ
պնչատ:պնչատ
պչրուհի:պչրուհի
ջոկ:ջոկ
սալայատակ:սալայատակ
սլաւ:սլաւ
բալտերէն:բալտերէն
սկնդուկ:սկնդուկ
սնանկ:սնանկ
սոսկական:սոսկական
ստերջ:ստերջ
ստորադասական:ստորադասական
սրբուհի:սրբուհի
վաչկատուն:վաչկատուն
վարար:վարար
վեհափառ:վեհափառ
վրացերէն:վրացերէն
տարագիր:տարագիր
տիտան:տիտան
տղացկան:տղացկան
փանաքի:փանաքի
փասքուս:փասքուս
փոխ:փոխ
քաղքենի:քաղքենի
քաջագործ:քաջագործ
քնաշրջիկ:քնաշրջիկ
Աթենացւոց:Աթենացւոց
ախոռժահամ:ախոռժահամ
ամբիծ:ամբիծ
ամբիծ:ամբիծ
ամպախաղաց:ամպախաղաց
այսմ:այսմ
անբացադրելի:անբացադրելի
անգործածական:անգործածական
անընդհատական:անընդհատական
անիրազեկ:անիրազեկ
անհամակիր:անհամակիր
անձեռներէց:անձեռներէց
անմռունջ:անմռունջ
աննկատ:աննկատ
անշնորհք:անշնորհք
անպարիշտ:անպարիշտ
անտերունչ:անտերունչ
առանձնայատուկ:առանձնայատուկ
ասուեայ:ասուեայ
աստղալից:աստղալից
արժէքաւոր:արժէքաւոր
արմատակից:արմատակից
բազմափոփոխ:բազմափոփոխ
բնորոշ:բնորոշ
բոպիկ:բոպիկ
գեղեցկածին:գեղեցկածին
գեղջկական:գեղջկական
գետընկէց:գետընկէց
գերիվերոյ:գերիվերոյ
գործեալ:գործեալ
դերբայական:դերբայական
եռանդնոտ:եռանդնոտ
երդմնադրուժ:երդմնադրուժ
երեսպաշտ:երեսպաշտ
երեւանեան:երեւանեան
երեքական:երեքական
զիջողական:զիջողական
զուգահեռ:զուգահեռ
թանկարժէք:թանկարժէք
թերուդէմ:թերուդէմ
թրակեան:թրակեան
թրակիական:թրակիական
իմաստնագոյն:իմաստնագոյն
ինըսներորդ:ինըսներորդ
ինըսուն:ինըսուն
ինըսուներորդ:ինըսուներորդ
լուսընկայ:լուսընկայ
լրագրական:լրագրական
խաժակ:խաժակ
խոնջ:խոնջ
ծիրանաւոր:ծիրանաւոր
ծուռումուռ:ծուռումուռ
կամաւորական:կամաւորական
կենդրոնախոյս:կենդրոնախոյս
կենդրոնական:կենդրոնական
կենդրոնաձիգ:կենդրոնաձիգ
կունտ:կունտ
հանուրց:հանուրց
հետեւողական:հետեւողական
հնդկական:հնդկական
հռոմայեցի:հռոմայեցի
հրաբղխային:հրաբղխային
ձեւաւոր:ձեւաւոր
ճոռոմախօս:ճոռոմախօս
մանրիկ:մանրիկ
մելամաղձոտ:մելամաղձոտ
մէկական:մէկական
յայտյանդիման:յայտյանդիման
յարուցեալ:յարուցեալ
Յունաց:Յունաց
նախապաշարեալ:նախապաշարեալ
շշմեցուցիչ:շշմեցուցիչ
շչողական:շչողական
ոսկ-ումբրերէն:ոսկ-ումբրերէն
պատուհանաւոր:պատուհանաւոր
պարտադիր:պարտադիր
պարտասուն:պարտասուն
պէսպէս:պէսպէս
պուշ:պուշ
ռիժդ:ռիժդ
սնամէջ:սնամէջ
սրտցաւ:սրտցաւ
վախճանական:վախճանական
քաշողական:քաշողական
քարթու:քարթու
քմայքոտ:քմայքոտ
որակեալ:որակեալ
բարձրեալ:բարձրեալ

LEXICON AdvReg
ակամայ:ակամայ
անշփոթ:անշփոթ
անպայման:անպայման
արագ:արագ
բարձր:բարձր
գեղեցիկ:գեղեցիկ
կարճ:կարճ
հանդարտ:հանդարտ
մոլեգին:մոլեգին
չափազանց:չափազանց
քաջ:քաջ
ամուր:ամուր
անխռով:անխռով
անկասկած:անկասկած
անհրաժեշտ:անհրաժեշտ
գաղտ:գաղտ
հերիք:հերիք
այժմու:այժմու
անդադար:անդադար
անդարձ:անդարձ
անընդհատ:անընդհատ
անխտիր:անխտիր
անհետ:անհետ
անյապաղ:անյապաղ
ապառիկ:ապառիկ
աքացի:աքացի
եւեթ:եւեթ
զուարթագին:զուարթագին
ընտրովի:ընտրովի
լռելեայն:լռելեայն
կանխիկ:կանխիկ
կողմնակի:կողմնակի
հարիւրաւոր:հարիւրաւոր
հետէ:հետէ
հոտ:հոտ
մանրամասն:մանրամասն
մասնակի:մասնակի
մեկուսի:մեկուսի
միաժամանակ:միաժամանակ
միս-մինակ:միս-մինակ
յաճախակի:յաճախակի
յանկարծակի:յանկարծակի
յեղակարծ:յեղակարծ
շարունակ:շարունակ
ուսկէ:ուսկէ
ուսկից:ուսկից
չորիցս:չորիցս
ստէպ:ստէպ
սրտագին:սրտագին
վայրավատին:վայրավատին
վերիվերոյ:վերիվերոյ
ցարդ:ցարդ
համեմատ:համեմատ
ամենուստեք:ամենուստեք
առերեսս:առերեսս
առտուանց:առտուանց
աստիճանբար:աստիճանբար
բազմիցս:բազմիցս
բաղառաբար:բաղառաբար
գունդագունգ:գունդագունգ
դոյնպէս:դոյնպէս
ընդոր:ընդոր
թեւանցիկ:թեւանցիկ
ինտոր:ինտոր
լեզուագիտօրէն:լեզուագիտօրէն
լեզուաւ:լեզուաւ
լրիւ:լրիւ
կարօտագին:կարօտագին
հարկաւ:հարկաւ
հեռուստ:հեռուստ
մերձուստ:մերձուստ
մօտուստ:մօտուստ
յանկարծուստ:յանկարծուստ
յիսնիցս:յիսնիցս
յստակաբար:յստակաբար
նանկ:նանկ
նապէս:նապէս
սանկ:սանկ
սկզբան:սկզբան
տնովին:տնովին
քանիպատիկ:քանիպատիկ
ցկեանս:ցկեանս
ցմահ:ցմահ

LEXICON VerbRootNulV(2)		#Obsolete/Archaic Class Class 21 երդնուլ
զերծնուլ:զերծ  <iv>

LEXICON NounReg
աշխարհաբար:աշխարհաբար
աշխարհային:աշխարհային
աշխոյժ:աշխոյժ
իրաներէն:իրաներէն
ապաշաւ:ապաշաւ
առընթերակայ:առընթերակայ
ասորերէն:ասորերէն
Արածանի:Արածանի
արիւնակից:արիւնակից
անակնկալ:անակնկալ
արձակ:արձակ
երկակենցաղ:երկակենցաղ
իրաւախոհ:իրաւախոհ
դուռն:դուռն
բերանացի:բերանացի
խորանարդ:խորանարդ
հնարագիւտ:հնարագիւտ
միավանկ:միավանկ
ահեակ:ահեակ
աջ:աջ
բարակ:բարակ
գանգուր:գանգուր
գլխաւոր:գլխաւոր
դռնբաց:դռնբաց
դրացի:դրացի
կեղտերէն:կեղտերէն
եղջերեայ:եղջերեայ
զովացուցիչ:զովացուցիչ
ծեր:ծեր
հասկաքաղ:հասկաքաղ
ճարտարախօս:ճարտարախօս
շփոթ:շփոթ
պզտիկ:պզտիկ
անցեալ:անցեալ
ապագայ:ապագայ
բարձրեալը:բարձրեալը
բացառական:բացառական
բռնաւոր:բռնաւոր
գաղթական:գաղթական
գաճաճ:գաճաճ
գործիական:գործիական
դատապարտեալ:դատապարտեալ
եռագոյն:եռագոյն
զօրավիգ:զօրավիգ
բախտախնդիր:բախտախնդիր
բաղաձայն:բաղաձայն
բժշկական:բժշկական
բիւր:բիւր
գաղութ:գաղութ
գչիր:գչիր
դանդաղ:դանդաղ
եռանդն:եռանդն
երկբարբառ:երկբարբառ
զուարճախօս:զուարճախօս
թմրեցուցիչ:թմրեցուցիչ
թնճուկ:թնճուկ
իլիական:իլիական
լեգէոն:լեգէոն
խարոյկ:խարոյկ
խելապատակ:խելապատակ
խմորեղէն:խմորեղէն
խոռոչ:խոռոչ
խորոված:խորոված
խռովարար:խռովարար
Ծաղկազարդ:Ծաղկազարդ
կամշոտ:կամշոտ
կցկտուր:կցկտուր
համադամ:համադամ
հարցուփորձ:հարցուփորձ
հեռարձակ:հեռարձակ
հետեւական:հետեւական
հոգատար:հոգատար
Հռոմ:Հռոմ
հրանիւթ:հրանիւթ
ձայնարձակ:ձայնարձակ
ձեռակերտ:ձեռակերտ
ճիգն:ճիգն
ճպուռն:ճպուռն
միջերկրական:միջերկրական
մխած:մխած
մսեղէն:մսեղէն
նորուս:նորուս
շատախօս:շատախօս
շատակեր:շատակեր
շքադիր:շքադիր
որկրամոլ:որկրամոլ
որսական:որսական
ուշ:ուշ
ուռոյց:ուռոյց
պատառատուն:պատառատուն
պարապորդ:պարապորդ
պճղնաւոր:պճղնաւոր
պողովատիկ:պողովատիկ
սանդալ:սանդալ
սեթեւեթ:սեթեւեթ
ստախօս:ստախօս
ստահակ:ստահակ
ստացական:ստացական
ստացուած:ստացուած
սրանկիւն:սրանկիւն
վայրկեան:վայրկեան
վեցօրեայ:վեցօրեայ
տաղասաց:տաղասաց
տարող:տարող
տպագիր:տպագիր
ցանկապատ:ցանկապատ
փլած:փլած
փորոտի:փորոտի
քարայատակ:քարայատակ
քարուկիր:քարուկիր
ճեմելի:ճեմելի
նուագածու:նուագածու
հիւսիսականք:հիւսիսականք
ազդանշան:ազդանշան
աթամանացի:աթամանացի
ալբաներէն:ալբաներէն
ախոռժակ:ախոռժակ
ածխաթթու:ածխաթթու
Ամերիկացիք:Ամերիկացիք
այբենարան:այբենարան
այբուբեն:այբուբեն
փռիւգացի:փռիւգացի
իլլիւրիացի:իլլիւրիացի
արամացի:արամացի
ռուսաստանցիք:ռուսաստանցիք
քրիստոնէական:քրիստոնէական
անեցի:անեցի
անկիւնադարձ:անկիւնադարձ
անձանց:անձանց
անձեռոց:անձեռոց
աշխարհք:աշխարհք
ատամ:ատամ
արտասուաց:արտասուաց
արքունեաց:արքունեաց
բանավէճ:բանավէճ
բառագանձ:բառագանձ
բառամթերք:բառամթերք
բարտի:բարտի
բեմասաց:բեմասաց
բոյր:բոյր
գետափ:գետափ
գերեզմանոց:գերեզմանոց
գէս:գէս
գիսակ:գիսակ
գործուածք:գործուածք
գրգլիք:գրգլիք
դազկահ:դազկահ
դաղձ:դաղձ
դուրգ:դուրգ
դրամապան:դրամապան
դրոշմակ:դրոշմակ
ելեկտրագէտ:ելեկտրագէտ
ելեւմուտ:ելեւմուտ
ելոյթ:ելոյթ
եղբարք:եղբարք
եղբօրաղջիկ:եղբօրաղջիկ
ենթաբարբառ:ենթաբարբառ
եռուզեռ:եռուզեռ
երգչախումբ:երգչախումբ
երկվեցեակ:երկվեցեակ
զեկուցագիր:զեկուցագիր
էջք:էջք
ընտրանի:ընտրանի
թիթեռ:թիթեռ
թոյլատու:թոյլատու
թրակացի:թրակացի
ժամակարգ:ժամակարգ
ժանկ:ժանկ
լեզուախումբ:լեզուախումբ
լեռնաշխարհ:լեռնաշխարհ
խզար:խզար
խճանկար:խճանկար
խոնջէնք:խոնջէնք
խրաց:խրաց
խցհան:խցհան
ծխատէր:ծխատէր
ծռազատիկ:ծռազատիկ
կաթնեղէն:կաթնեղէն
կախորրան:կախորրան
կահագիր:կահագիր
կանկառ:կանկառ
կաշառ:կաշառ
կառափ:կառափ
կենդրոն:կենդրոն
կերպարանօք:կերպարանօք
կղմինդր:կղմինդր
կտղուց:կտղուց
կրճիմ:կրճիմ
հայցուածք:հայցուածք
հանրագիտարան:հանրագիտարան
հանրաքուէ:հանրաքուէ
հաշուեմատեան:հաշուեմատեան
հաշուետոմար:հաշուետոմար
հարսնառ:հարսնառ
հարսնցու:հարսնցու
հարսնքուր:հարսնքուր
հեգնանք:հեգնանք
հեծանիւ:հեծանիւ
հեճուկ:հեճուկ
հերետիկոս:հերետիկոս
հիտտիտերէն:հիտտիտերէն
հիւսուածեղէն:հիւսուածեղէն
հնդկեղէգ:հնդկեղէգ
հրաբուղխ:հրաբուղխ
ձգախէժ:ձգախէժ
ճաշագիր:ճաշագիր
ճառախօս:ճառախօս
մագնէս:մագնէս
մալէզ:մալէզ
մախոխ:մախոխ
մաճկալ:մաճկալ
մաներկրորդ:մաներկրորդ
մանրադէտ:մանրադէտ
մասնախումբ:մասնախումբ
մատնեմատ:մատնեմատ
մատնցոյց:մատնցոյց
մարխ:մարխ
մարմրուք:մարմրուք
մարուք:մարուք
մեթոդ:մեթոդ
մեհենագիր:մեհենագիր
միանձունք:միանձունք
միջամատ:միջամատ
մլուկ:մլուկ
մորթավաճառ:մորթավաճառ
մսահատ:մսահատ
մրցանիշ:մրցանիշ
յաւերժահարս:յաւերժահարս
յետգիր:յետգիր
յուշագիր:յուշագիր
նախերգան:նախերգան
նշող:նշող
շառայլ:շառայլ
շիւան:շիւան
շլան:շլան
շողոմանք:շողոմանք
շոշոկանք:շոշոկանք
շոշորթ:շոշորթ
շռինչ:շռինչ
ոլոռ:ոլոռ
պահայոյզ:պահայոյզ
պաշտատական:պաշտատական
պաս:պաս
պատմագիր:պատմագիր
պատմուածք:պատմուածք
պարանցիկ:պարանցիկ
պճինք:պճինք
պռկունք:պռկունք
պտոյք:պտոյք
պրկուածք:պրկուածք
ջարդ:ջարդ
ռուպ:ռուպ
սակարկու:սակարկու
սաղմ:սաղմ
սամետի:սամետի
սառնարկղ:սառնարկղ
սեամ:սեամ
սեպագիր:սեպագիր
սերոբէ:սերոբէ
սպառ:սպառ
վրէպ:վրէպ
տակռիք:տակռիք
տարբերակ:տարբերակ
տարմալ:տարմալ
տոխարերէն:տոխարերէն
ցայգանուագ:ցայգանուագ
ցուցամատ:ցուցամատ
ցուցք:ցուցք
փայլատակունք:փայլատակունք
փլատակ:փլատակ
փողկապ:փողկապ
փոփոխմանց:փոփոխմանց
քաղհան:քաղհան
քայռամանեակ:քայռամանեակ
քենայր:քենայր
քենեկալ:քենեկալ
քերիչ:քերիչ
քերոբէ:քերոբէ
քղամիդ:քղամիդ
քոթոթ:քոթոթ
քուրչ:քուրչ
օդագրոհ:օդագրոհ
օդիք:օդիք
օդուղի:օդուղի
օրօրոց:օրօրոց
հայաստանցի:հայաստանցի
աթենացիք:աթենացիք
միանձունք:միանձունք
յոյնք:յոյնք
նախարարք:նախարարք
պարսիկք:պարսիկք

LEXICON NameMaleGiven
Այվազովսկի:Այվազովսկի

LEXICON VerbRootUc(2)		#Obsolete/Archaic, Class 8 թողուլ
արգելուլ:արգել <tv>
գերծուլ:գերծ <tv>

LEXICON NounUtjunSuffix
անհանդուրժողութիւն:անհանդուրժող
ատենագրութիւն:ատենագր
գոհողութիւն:գոհող
գոյացափոխութիւն:գոյացափոխ
գործառութիւն:գործառ
ինքնատեցութիւն:ինքնատեց
խնդակցութիւն:խնդակց
ծանրականութիւն:ծանրական
հաղորդագրութիւն:հաղորդագր
հիվանդութիւն:հիվանդ
հնչաբանութիւն:հնչաբան
մարդախօսութիւն:մարդախօս
մարմնախօսութիւն:մարմնախօս
յեղաշրջութիւն:յեղաշրջ
սխրագործութիւն:սխրագործ

LEXICON NounUmSuffix
անբարոյացում:անբարոյաց
առաջբերում:առաջբեր
Բաթում:Բաթ
գրականացում:գրականաց
խեղճացում:խեղճաց
հրաժարում:հրաժար
յեղափոխում:յեղափոխ
թորում:թորում
ձեւաւորում:ձեւաւոր
մերկացում:մերկաց
նախազգածում:նախազգած
փճացում:փճաց

LEXICON NounCountryUnreducible
Անտիտաւրոս:Անտիտաւրոս
Ատրպատական:Ատրպատական
Երեւան:Երեւան
Արշակաւան:Արշակաւան
Արտաշատ:Արտաշատ
Բողազ-ՔԷոյ:Բողազ-ՔԷոյ
Լենքորան:Լենքորան
Տրապիզոն:Տրապիզոն
Թաւրիզ:Թաւրիզ
Տաւրոս:Տաւրոս
LEXICON NounCountryBase
Թեսաղիա:Թեսաղիա
Թիւրքիա:Թիւրքիա
LEXICON NounCountryReduced
Թեսաղիա:Թեսաղի
Թիւրքիա:Թիւրքի

LEXICON NameMaleGiven
Բուզանդ:Բուզանդ
Լինչ:Լինչ
Խալաթեանց:Խալաթեանց
Խորենացի:Խորենացի
Կրեչմէր:Կրեչմէր
Մաշթոց:Մաշթոց
Յուստինիանոս:Յուստինիանոս
Նարեկացի:Նարեկացի
Չմշկիկ:Չմշկիկ

LEXICON NameFemaleGiven
Խոսրովուհի:Խոսրովուհի
